Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [53B.76] INTERCHANGE FEES; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Acquirer bank" means a member of a payment card network that contracts with a merchant, including directly or indirectly through a processor, to process and settle electronic payment transactions. new text end new text begin (c) "Authorization" means the process through which a merchant requests approval for an electronic payment transaction from the issuer. new text end new text begin (d) "Clearance" means the process to: (1) transmit final transaction data from a merchant to an issuer for posting to the cardholder's account; and (2) calculate fees and charges, including interchange fees, that apply to the issuer and the merchant. new text end new text begin (e) "Credit card" means a card or device issued under an arrangement pursuant to which a financial institution provides to a cardholder the privilege of obtaining credit from the financial institution or other person to purchase or lease property or services, obtain a loan, or otherwise. new text end new text begin (f) "Debit card" means a card or other payment code or device issued or approved for use through a payment card network to debit an asset account, regardless of the account's purpose or whether the debit authorization is based on a signature, a personal identification number, or other means. Debit card includes a general use prepaid card, as defined in United States Code, title 15, section 16931-1. Debit card does not include paper checks. new text end new text begin (g) "Electronic payment transaction" means a transaction in which a person uses a debit card, a credit card, or other payment code or device issued or approved through a payment card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of credit, whether the debit or credit line use authorization is based on a signature, a personal identification number, or other means. new text end new text begin (h) "Gratuity" means a voluntary monetary contribution to an employee from a consumer in connection with services rendered. new text end new text begin (i) "Interchange fee" means a fee established, charged, or received by a payment card network to compensate the issuer for the issuer's involvement in an electronic payment transaction. new text end new text begin (j) "Issuer" means a person issuing a debit card or credit card. Issuer includes the issuer's agent. new text end new text begin (k) "Merchant" means a person who collects and remits a tax. new text end new text begin (l) "Payment card network" means an entity that: new text end new text begin (1) directly or through licensed members, processors, or agents provides the proprietary services, infrastructure, and software to route information and data to conduct electronic payment transaction authorization, clearance, and settlement; and new text end new text begin (2) a merchant uses to accept as a form of payment a brand of debit card, credit card, or another device used to carry out electronic payment transactions. new text end new text begin (m) "Processor" means an entity that facilitates, services, processes, or manages the debit or credit authorization, billing, transfer, payment procedures, or settlement with respect to an electronic payment transaction. new text end new text begin (n) "Settlement" means the process of transmitting sales information to the issuing bank to collect and reimburse funds to the merchant and calculate and report the net transaction amount to the issuer and merchant for an electronic payment transaction that is cleared. new text end new text begin (o) "Tax" means any tax imposed by the state or local government at the point of sale. new text end new text begin (p) "Tax documentation" means documentation sufficient for the payment card network to determine the total amount of the electronic payment transaction and the tax or gratuity amount of the transaction, whether related to a single electronic payment transaction or multiple electronic payment transactions aggregated over a period of time. Tax documentation includes but is not limited to invoices, receipts, journals, ledgers, and tax returns filed with the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Interchange fees on taxes and gratuity prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) An issuer, a payment card network, an acquirer bank, or a processor is prohibited from receiving or charging a merchant an interchange fee on the tax amount or gratuity of an electronic payment transaction if the merchant informs the acquirer bank or the acquirer bank's designee of the tax or gratuity amount as part of the authorization or settlement process for the electronic payment transaction. The merchant must transmit the tax or gratuity amount data as part of the authorization or settlement process to avoid being charged interchange fees on the tax or gratuity amount of an electronic payment transaction. new text end new text begin (b) A merchant that does not transmit the tax or gratuity amount data in accordance with this section may submit tax documentation for the electronic payment transaction to the acquirer bank or the acquirer bank's designee no later than 180 days after the date the electronic payment transaction occurs. Within 30 days after the date the merchant submits the necessary tax documentation, the issuer must credit to the merchant the amount of interchange fees charged on the tax or gratuity amount of the electronic payment transaction. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not create liability for a payment card network regarding the accuracy of the tax or gratuity data reported by the merchant. new text end new text begin (d) An issuer, a payment card network, an acquirer bank, or a processor is prohibited from altering or manipulating the calculation and imposition of interchange fees by increasing the rate or amount of the fees applicable to or imposed upon the portion of a credit or debit card transaction that are not attributable to taxes or other fees charged to the retailer. new text end